Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 6
ELECTION JUDGES

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this article was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of this article for 1980 and 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

1-6-101. Qualifications for election judges - student election judges - definition - legislative declaration.

As used in this article, "election judge" means a registered elector appointed by the county clerk and recorder or designated elected official to perform the election duties assigned by the county clerk and recorder or designated election official. As used in this article, "election judge" also includes a student election judge appointed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section.

The persons appointed as election judges, except for persons appointed as student election judges pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, shall certify in writing that they meet the following qualifications:

They are registered electors of the state and are willing to serve;

They are physically and mentally able to perform and complete the assigned tasks;

They will attend a class of instruction concerning the tasks of an election judge prior to each election;

They have never been convicted of election fraud, any other election offense, or fraud; and

They are neither a candidate whose name appears on the ballot in the precinct that they are appointed to serve nor a member of the immediate family, related by blood, marriage, or civil union to the second degree, of a candidate whose name appears on the ballot in the precinct that they are appointed to serve.

With regard to any nonpartisan election that is not coordinated by the county clerk and recorder, the election judge shall be a registered elector of the political subdivision for which the election is being held. If enough registered electors of the political subdivision are not available, then the appointing authority may appoint election judges who are registered electors of the state.

Before serving as an election judge, any person recommended as an election judge in accordance with section 1-6-102, 1-6-103, 1-6-103.5, or 1-6-103.7 shall complete and file an acceptance form with the county clerk and recorder or other designated election official as provided in section 1-6-106. The acceptance forms may be kept on file with the county clerk and recorder or other designated election official for up to two years from the date of signing the acceptance form.

The county clerk and recorder or the designated election official shall hold a class of instruction concerning the tasks of an election judge and a special school of instruction concerning the task of a supervisor judge not more than sixty days prior to each election.

Each person appointed as an election judge shall be required to attend one class of instruction prior to the first election in an election cycle in which the person will serve as an election judge. The county clerk and recorder or other designated election official may require a person appointed as an election judge to attend more than one class of instruction in an election cycle.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, in order to promote a greater awareness among young people concerning the electoral process, the rights and responsibilities of voters, and the importance of citizen participation in public affairs, as well as to provide additional qualified individuals willing and able to assist with the electoral process, qualified students may be allowed to serve as student election judges. Therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly in enacting this subsection (7) to authorize designated election officials to appoint qualified students to serve as election judges in conformity with this section.

As used in this article, "student election judge" means a student who meets the requirements of this subsection (7) and who is appointed by a designated election official for service as an election judge pursuant to this section.

The designated election officials may work with school districts and public or private secondary educational institutions to identify students willing and able to serve as student election judges. Such school districts or educational institutions may submit the names of the students to the designated election official of the jurisdiction in which the school district or educational institution is located for appointment as student election judges. Home-schooled students may apply to the designated election official for appointment as a student election judge pursuant to this section. From among the names submitted, the designated election officials may select students to serve as student election judges who meet the following qualifications:

They are a United States citizen or will be a citizen at the time of the election to which the student is serving as a student election judge;

They are willing to serve;

They are physically and mentally able to perform and complete the assigned tasks;

They will attend a class of instruction concerning the tasks of an election judge prior to each election;

They have never been convicted of election fraud, any other election offense, or fraud;

They are not a member of the immediate family, related by blood, marriage, or civil union to the second degree, of a candidate whose name appears on the ballot in the precinct that they are appointed to serve;

They are sixteen years of age or older and either a junior or senior in good standing attending a public or private secondary educational institution or being home-schooled at the time of the election to which the student is serving as a student election judge; and

Their parent or legal guardian has consented to their service as a student election judge.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 723, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

IP(1) amended and (3) and (4) added, p. 1414, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(d) and (2) amended, p. 1744, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 574, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(1) and IP(2) amended and (7) added, p. 1333, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4) and (6) amended, p. 1631, § 8, effective June 7.

L. 2005:

(5) amended, p. 1403, § 23, effective June 6; (5) amended, p. 1438, § 23, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(5) amended, p. 1977, § 20, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(7)(a), (7)(b), and IP(7)(c) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 683, § 23, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(2)(e), (5), and (7)(c)(VI) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 715, § 54, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

(2)(a) and (5) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1608, § 14, effective May 29.

Cross references:

(1) For transferring names of electors when precinct boundaries changed, see § 1-2-223; for the power of the board of county commissioners to form new precincts, change the names of precincts, or reduce the numbers of precincts, see § 30-11-114.

(2) In 2013, subsections (2)(e), (5), and (7)(c)(VI) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-6-102. List furnished by precinct committeepersons.

No later than ten days after the precinct caucus in even-numbered years, the committeepersons of each precinct from each major political party shall submit to the county chairpersons of their respective political parties a list that was initiated at the precinct caucus and that recommends registered electors as election judges. The registered electors recommended as election judges must reside in the precinct and have a current affiliation with the political party that held the precinct caucus.

If there is no county chairperson, the committeeperson of each precinct shall submit the list that was initiated at the precinct caucus and that recommends registered electors as election judges directly to the county clerk and recorder. If a precinct has no committeeperson, the district captain, if any, shall submit the list of recommended election judges to the county chairperson or county clerk and recorder, as appropriate.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 723, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 575, § 2, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-106 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-6-103. Recommendations by county chairperson.

No later than the last Tuesday of April in even-numbered years, the county chairperson of each major political party in the county shall certify to the county clerk and recorder the names and addresses of registered electors recommended to serve as election judges for each precinct in the county.

Repealed.

The county chairperson, or, if there is no county chairperson, the committeepersons who submitted the list of registered electors in accordance with section 1-6-102 (2) shall designate the order of preference of the names of the registered electors recommended to serve as election judges for each precinct. The county clerk and recorder shall select election judges from each precinct list in the county chairperson's, or, if there is no county chairperson, the committeeperson's, order of preference.

In recommending registered electors as election judges, the county chairperson may select only names from the list submitted by the precinct committeepersons. However, the county chairperson may recommend additional registered electors to the county clerk and recorder if the precinct committeepersons do not provide enough names to the county chairperson.

and (5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 576, § 3, effective April 30, 1998.)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 724, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 576, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 134, § 6, effective March 27.

1-6-103.5. Recommendations by minor political parties.

No later than sixty days before a primary or general election, the county chairperson or other authorized official of a minor political party may certify to the county clerk and recorder an initial list of the names and addresses of registered electors recommended to serve as election judges in the county. If the list contains more than one name, the order of preference must be indicated. The county clerk and recorder shall select election judges from the party according to such order of preference, if indicated.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1631, § 9, effective June 7.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1608, § 15, effective May 29.

1-6-103.7. Unaffiliated voters - self-nomination.

No later than sixty days before a primary or general election, any registered elector who is unaffiliated with a political party or political organization may give notice in writing to the clerk and recorder of the county in which such elector resides offering to serve as an election judge and stating that the elector is a registered elector and is unaffiliated with any political party or political organization.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1631, § 9, effective June 7.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1609, § 16, effective May 29.

1-6-104. Appointment of election judges by county clerk and recorder and designated election officials.

For each election coordinated by the county clerk and recorder, the county clerk and recorder shall appoint election judges for each location where election activities are occurring.

The county clerk and recorder may appoint an election judge to serve in a county other than the county in which the election judge resides.

If, at the time the county clerk and recorder appoints election judges, the list of recommended election judges submitted in accordance with section 1-6-102 contains an insufficient number of names for a major political party's share of the total number of election judges as required in section 1-6-109, the designated election official shall appoint any additional election judges necessary from among the persons recommended by minor political parties in accordance with section 1-6-103.5 and the unaffiliated voters who have offered to serve as election judges in accordance with section 1-6-103.7.

For each election coordinated by the county clerk and recorder, the county clerk and recorder may appoint one or more student election judges that satisfy the requirements contained in section 1-6-101 (7) to serve as an election judge, and shall designate the locations where election activities are occurring in which the student election judge shall serve based upon the number of qualified students and vacancies in the number of available positions for election judges throughout the county.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 725, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 576, § 4, effective April 30.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 161, § 13, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(4) added, p. 1334, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1632, § 10, effective June 7.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1609, § 17, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-101 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For removal of election judges, see §§ 1-6-119 and 1-6-120.

1-6-105. Appointment of election judges for elections not coordinated by county clerk and recorder.

Except as provided for special district elections in subsection (1.5) of this section, no later than forty-five days before the regular election, the governing body with authority to call elections shall appoint election judges for the political subdivision. The term of office of election judges shall be two years from the date of appointment.

(1.5) No later than forty-five days before a regular special district election, the designated election official shall appoint election judges for the special district unless otherwise directed by the board of directors of such district.

Any person who has been appointed by a county clerk and recorder and meets the qualifications as prescribed in section 1-6-101 may be appointed as an election judge for elections not coordinated by the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 725, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 577, § 5, effective April 30.

L. 99:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 451, § 7, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-101 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-6-106. Confirmation and acceptance of election judge appointment.

The designated election official shall confirm the appointments of election judges by mailing each appointed election judge a certification of appointment and an acceptance form.

The acceptance form shall contain:

The statement of qualifications as prescribed in section 1-6-101; and

A statement that, if the person appointed as an election judge either fails to file the acceptance form within seven days after the certification of appointment and acceptance form are mailed or fails to attend a class of instruction as required in section 1-6-101 (5), the designated election official may determine that a vacancy has been created.

Each person appointed as an election judge shall file an acceptance form in the office of the designated election official within seven days after the certification of appointment and acceptance form have been mailed. If a person appointed as an election judge fails to file the acceptance form as described in subsection (2) of this section or fails to attend a class of instruction as required in section 1-6-101 (5), the designated election official may determine that a vacancy has been created.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 725, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 577, § 6, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-108 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-6-107. Acceptances - school of instruction - appointment of supply judge. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 725, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 584, § 19, effective April 30.

1-6-108. Lists of election judges.

The designated election official shall make and maintain a master list of election judges who have filed an acceptance form in accordance with section 1-6-101 (4). The master list shall include the name, affiliation, and precinct number of each election judge who has filed an acceptance form, including whether such judge is unaffiliated, affiliated with a minor political party, or affiliated with a qualified political organization.

Any person may obtain, upon written request and payment of the appropriate fee, an exact copy of the list of county election judges from the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 726, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 578, § 7, effective April 30.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 161, § 14, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-108 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-6-109. Party affiliation of election judges in partisan elections - definition.

For partisan elections in voter service and polling centers that have an even number of election judges, each major political party is entitled to one-half of the number of election judges.

For partisan elections in voter service and polling centers that have an odd number of election judges, one major political party is entitled to the extra election judge in one-half of the voter service and polling centers, as determined by the county clerk and recorder, and the other major political party is entitled to the extra election judge in the other one-half of the voter service and polling centers, as determined by the county clerk and recorder.

If an odd number of voter service and polling centers exist, the county clerk and recorder shall determine which major political party is entitled to any extra election judge. The county clerk and recorder shall make this determination either by mutual agreement of both of the major political parties or, if the two major political parties cannot agree, by lot.

and (5) Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 726, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 578, § 8, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(4) repealed, p. 1642, § 39, effective June 7.

L. 2012:

(5) added, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 684, § 24, effective May 17.

L. 2018:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1610, § 18, effective May 29.

1-6-109.5. Appointment and duties of supervisor judge - definition.

The designated election official shall appoint at least one election judge in each voter service and polling center as supervisor judge. To the extent possible, supervisor judges must be from a major political party, and if more than one supervisor judge is serving at a voter service and polling center, the judges must be of different political party affiliations. The designated election official shall notify the supervisor judge of the appointment.

For partisan elections, each major political party is entitled to one-half of the total number of supervisor judges appointed. If an odd number of supervisor judges is appointed, the county clerk and recorder shall determine which major political party is entitled to the one extra supervisor judge. The county clerk and recorder makes this determination by the mutual agreement of the two major political parties or, if the two major political parties cannot agree, by lot.

Prior to the election, the supervisor judge shall attend a special school of instruction held by the designated election official.

The supervisor judge shall coordinate the conduct of the election in the polling location. For nonpartisan elections, the supervisor judge's responsibilities include receiving election supplies and equipment from the designated election official; delivering election supplies and equipment to the polling location, and returning all election supplies, election equipment, and ballots to the designated election official once the election is concluded.

For partisan elections, the county clerk and recorder may deputize a courier to return the election supplies, election equipment, and ballots to the county clerk and recorder once the election is concluded. If the county clerk and recorder does not deputize a courier, the supervisor judge and a second election judge from the voter service and polling center shall return the election supplies, election equipment, and the ballots to the county clerk and recorder. The second election judge is selected by the election judges in the voter service and polling center other than the supervisor judge and must have a political affiliation different than the supervisor judge.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 579, § 9, effective April 30.

L. 2012:

(5) added, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 684, § 25, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 716, § 55, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1610, § 19, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (5), effective January 1, 2015. (See L. 2012, p. 684.)

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-6-110. Judges at primary elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 727, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 584, § 20, effective April 30.

1-6-111. Number of election judges.

For partisan elections, the county clerk and recorder shall appoint at least three election judges to serve as judges for each voter service and polling center to perform the designated functions, one of whom may be a student election judge appointed pursuant to section 1-6-101 (7). In each voter service and polling center, notwithstanding any other provision of this article and subject to the availability of election judges who meet the affiliation requirements of section 1-6-109, of the election judges appointed to serve as voter service and polling center judges pursuant to this subsection (1), there shall be at least one election judge from each major political party who is not a student election judge.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 580, 10, effective April 30, 1998.)

When two election judges who are not of the same political affiliation are present at the voter service and polling center, voting may proceed.

For nonpartisan elections, the designated election official shall appoint no fewer than two election judges to serve as judges for each voter service and polling center to perform the designated functions.

The designated election official and, for partisan elections, the county clerk and recorder may appoint other election judges as needed to perform duties other than voter service and polling center duties. These duties may include inspecting ballots, duplicating ballots, and counting paper ballots. For partisan elections, if the county clerk and recorder appoints election judges to perform duties other than voter service and polling center duties, the county clerk and recorder shall appoint two election judges to perform such duties. The two election judges so appointed shall not be of the same political affiliation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

Where student election judges have been appointed by the county clerk and recorder to serve in a particular voter service and polling center pursuant to this article 6, no more than half of the total number of election judges serving in any one polling location are permitted to be student election judges.

Subject to the requirements of this article 6 regarding the number and party affiliation of election judges, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official may allow an election judge to work at a voter service and polling center for a shift lasting less than an entire day; except that at least two judges of different affiliations must be present at each voter service and polling center at all times.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 727, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 580, § 10, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(1) amended and (7) added, p. 1335, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(6) amended, p. 1106, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2007:

(6) amended and (8) added, p. 1977, § 21, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 716, § 56, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

(3), (4), (5), (7), and (8) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1610, § 20, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-5-104 and 1-5-105 as they existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-6-112. Number of judges in nonpartisan elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 727, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 584, § 21, effective April 30.

1-6-113. Vacancies.

If for any reason any person selected to serve as an election judge fails to attend the class of instruction for election judges, or refuses, fails, or is unable to serve, or is removed by preemption in accordance with section 1-6-119 (1) or for cause in accordance with section 1-6-119 (2), the designated election official thereafter may appoint an election judge to fill such vacancy. For a partisan election, an election judge shall be appointed to fill such vacancy from any of the lists of names previously submitted in accordance with sections 1-6-102, 1-6-103, and 1-6-103.5 or from the unaffiliated voters who have offered to serve as election judges in accordance with section 1-6-103.7.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 727, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1415, § 59, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1632, § 11, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

(2) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3026, § 33, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-110 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsection (2) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-6-114. Judges - oath required - electioneering prohibited.

Before beginning the duties of an election judge, each person appointed as an election judge must take a self-affirming oath or affirmation in substantially the following form:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 838, § 54, effective July 1, 1995.)

For nonpartisan elections, the election judges shall not be required to declare their affiliation on the oath or affirmation.

A person shall not engage in electioneering, as defined in section 1-13-714, or wear or display apparel, buttons, or other materials that promote or oppose a political party, candidate, ballot issue, or ballot question while serving as an election judge.

I, ..................., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen of the United States and the state of Colorado; that I am an eligible elector who resides in the county of .................... or within the ....... political subdivision; that I am a member of the ............... party (or that I am unaffiliated with a political party) as shown in the statewide voter registration system; that I will perform the duties of judge according to law and the best of my ability; that I will studiously strive to prevent fraud, deceit, and abuse in conducting the same; that I will not try to determine how any elector voted, nor will I disclose how any elector voted if in the discharge of my duties as judge such knowledge comes to me, unless called upon to disclose the same before some court of justice; that I have never been convicted of election fraud, any other election offense, or fraud and that, if any ballots are counted before the polls close on the date of the election, I will not disclose the result of the votes until after the polls have closed and the results are formally announced by the designated election official.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 728, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1415, § 60, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 838, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 580, § 11, effective April 30.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 162, § 15, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1632, § 12, effective June 7.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 580, § 44, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(4) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1647, § 31, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-111 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-6-115. Compensation of judges.

In all elections, including primary and general elections, each election judge serving in the precincts on election day shall receive not less than five dollars as compensation for services provided as judge at any election. At the discretion of the county clerk and recorder or designated election official, a student election judge appointed pursuant to the provisions of this article may receive the same compensation received by an election judge but, in any case, not less than seventy-five percent of the compensation received by an election judge for service provided as a judge at any election.

In addition to the compensation provided by subsection (1) of this section, each election judge and student election judge may be paid expenses and reasonable compensation for attending election schools which may be established by the county clerk and recorder or the designated election official. Each supervisor judge appointed by the county clerk and recorder shall be reimbursed no less than five dollars for attending a special school of instruction.

(2.5) The supervisor judge and, for partisan elections, the second election judge selected in accordance with section 1-6-109.5 (4)(b), shall be paid no less than four dollars for returning the election supplies, election equipment, and the ballots to the designated election official. The person providing the transportation may be paid a mileage allowance, to be set by the designated election official but not to exceed the mileage rate authorized for county officials and employees, for each mile necessarily traveled in excess of ten miles in going to and returning from the office of the designated election official.

Compensation for election judges shall be determined and paid by the governing body calling the election. Compensation for all judges shall be uniform throughout a particular political subdivision, except:

The compensation of student election judges shall be set in conformity with subsection (1) of this section; and

A county is not required to compensate a county employee serving as an election judge in accordance with this section.

Election judges must give the designated election officials their social security numbers in order to receive compensation; however, service as an election judge shall not be considered employment pursuant to articles 70 to 82 of title 8, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 728, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1416, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 839, § 55, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) and (2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 581, § 12, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1335, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1633, § 13, effective June 7.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 48, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) and (2.5) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 717, § 57, effective May 10.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3027, § 34, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-112 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the mileage rate authorized for county officers and employees, see § 30-11-107 (1)(t).

(2) In 2013, subsections (2) and (2.5) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-6-116. Delivery of election returns and other election papers - compensation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 729, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1416, § 62, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1162, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 585, § 22, effective April 30.

1-6-117. Judges for new or changed precincts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 729, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 585, § 23, effective April 30.

1-6-118. Judges may change polling place. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 729, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1416, § 63, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 585, § 24, effective April 30.

1-6-119. Removal of election judge by designated election official.

If a county chairperson of a major political party or the county chairperson or other authorized official of a minor political party believes that an election judge appointed to represent that party is not faithfully or fairly representing the party or that an election judge has moved from the county, the county chairperson or authorized official may exercise a preemptive removal of the election judge. The county chairperson or authorized official shall notify the county clerk and recorder and the election judge of the preemptive removal in writing. The county clerk and recorder shall fill any vacancy created by the preemptive removal as provided in section 1-6-113.

Prior to election day, the designated election official may remove an election judge for cause. Cause includes but is not limited to the election judge's failure to file an acceptance form in accordance with sections 1-6-101 and 1-6-106 and the election judge's failure to attend a class of instruction as required in section 1-6-101 (5).

On election day, the designated election official may remove an election judge who has neglected the duties of the office by failing to appear at the polling location by 7:30 a.m., by leaving the polling location before completing all of the duties assigned, by being unable or unwilling or by refusing to perform the duties of the office, or by electioneering.

Upon receipt of a written complaint made by an eligible elector of the political subdivision concerning an election judge, the designated election official shall investigate the complaint and may remove the election judge and appoint another election judge in accordance with section 1-6-113.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 730, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 839, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 581, § 13, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 1633, § 14, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 718, § 58, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-116 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (3) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-6-120. Removal of election judges by the court.

Upon the failure or neglect of any election judge to perform the duties of the office, any other election judge, the designated election official, the county chairperson of a political party, or an eligible elector of the political subdivision for which the election judge is appointed, having knowledge of the failure or neglect, shall cause proper action for removal to be instituted against the election judge.

Election judges who neglect their duties, who commit, encourage, or connive in any fraud in connection with their duties, who violate any of the election laws or knowingly permit others to do so, who are convicted of any crime, who violate their oath, who wrongfully hamper or interfere or tend to interfere with the regular performance of the duties of the other election judges, who commit any other act that interferes or tends to interfere with a fair and honest registration and election, or who are not appointed in accordance with the provisions of this article may be removed in the following manner:

Any eligible elector may file a brief petition in the district court at any time up to twelve days before any election, setting out in brief and concise language the facts constituting the cause for the removal of the election judge. The petition shall be verified, but the verification may be upon information and belief. Upon filing of the petition, the court shall issue a citation to the election judge directing an appearance within forty-eight hours to answer the petition if the election judge desires to do so.

The court shall proceed summarily to hear and finally dispose of the petition and may set a hearing within forty-eight hours after the answer is filed. Evidence given by any accused election judge at the hearing shall not be used against that election judge in any civil, criminal, or other proceedings. If the court decides that the election judge should be removed for any cause stated in the petition, the court shall so order and shall immediately notify the appropriate election official.

The validity of any part of the registration or election already completed or other acts performed under this code, if otherwise legally performed, shall not be affected by the removal of an election judge and shall be in every respect valid and regular. The successor of any election judge removed shall proceed with the duties of the election judge with the same power and effect as though originally appointed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 730, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

(2)(a) amended, p. 839, § 57, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-117 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-6-121. Election judge vacancies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 582, § 14, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1642, § 39, effective June 7.